Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-215
Statement; failure to furnish; penalty.

Any person who fails to obey the provisions of subsection (1) of section
76-214 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof
shall be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars nor exceeding five hundred
dollars.

Laws 1917, c. 224, § 2, p. 550;

C.S.1922, § 5663;

C.S.1929, § 76-269;

R.S.1943, § 76-215;

Laws 1965, c. 456, § 2, p. 1450;

Laws 1965, c. 457, § 2, p. 1452;

Laws 1994, LB 1275, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB536, § 30.